Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska21-2,206
Amended certificate of authority.

(MBCA 15.04) (a) A foreign
corporation authorized to transact business in this state must obtain an amended
certificate of authority from the Secretary of State if it changes:

(1) Its corporate name;

(2) The period of its duration;
or

(3)
The state or country of its incorporation.

(b) The requirements of section 21-2,205 for obtaining
an original certificate of authority apply to obtaining an amended certificate
under this section.

Laws 2014, LB749, § 206.